Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5250.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-23-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-23 entitled "Holiday
Business" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-23-1. Definitions.
(a) “Holiday,” whenever used in this chapter includes: New Year’s Day, Memorial Day,
Juneteenth National Freedom Day, Fourth of July, Victory Day, Labor Day, Columbus Day,
Veteran’s Day, Thanksgiving Day (but only in those years that the governor by public proclamation
designates it as a legal holiday), and Christmas, or on any day that any enumerated holiday is
officially celebrated.
(b) “Retail establishment,” whenever used in this chapter, includes any business making
sales at retail in this state, but this definition does not include victualing houses principally serving
prepared food for consumption on and off the premises, including those houses licensed under
chapter 24 of this title.
(c) “Town council,” whenever used in this chapter, includes “city council” except in the
city of Providence where it means “bureau of licenses” and any duly constituted licensing authority
existing in any other city or town.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000886/SUB A
========